Wyoming, session 2025, HB0024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-3-102(a)(xxiii) and by creating a
new paragraph (xxiv), 39-17-301(a)(iv), (vii), (xvi),
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
(xxv), (xxviii), (xxxviii), (xlviii) and by creating new
paragraphs (l) through (lii), 39-17-303(a) by creating a
new paragraph (iii) and (c) by creating new paragraphs (ii)
and (iii), 39-17-304(a)(intro) and by creating a new
paragraph (iv), 39-17-307(a)(i)(A) through (C), (E), (F),
(ii), (iii) and (iv)(A) and 39-17-308(c) by creating a new
paragraph (ix) are amended to read:

31-3-102. Miscellaneous fees.

(a) The following fees shall be collected for the
instruments or privileges indicated:

(xxiii) An annual decal which that shall include
the bucking horse and rider emblem for a plug-in registered
and licensed electric an all-electric vehicle as defined in
W.S. 39-17-301(a)(xxxviii) 39-17-301(a)(l) .........$200.00

(xxiv) An annual decal that shall include the
bucking horse and rider emblem for a plug-in hybrid
electric vehicle....................................$100.00

39-17-301. Definitions.
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073

(a) As used in this article:

(iv) "Billed gallons" means the gallons,
gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE), or diesel gallon
equivalent (DGE) or kilowatt hours billed to the customer;

(vii) "Bulk alternative fuel" means thirty-five
(35) gallons or more or the gasoline gallon equivalent, or
the diesel gallon equivalent, or gasoline gallon equivalent
for electricity delivered at one (1) time, excluding
alternative fuels delivered into the attached tanks or
auxiliary tanks of a licensed motor vehicle;

(xvi) "Dispenser" means the point of taxation
for compressed natural gas, and liquefied natural gas and
any other alternative fuel designated by the department.
The "dispenser" is the point where the gas alternative fuel
is delivered into the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle;

(xxv) "Gasoline gallon equivalent" or "GGE"
means the gasoline gallon equivalent applied to
nonliquefied compressed natural gas in the amount of five
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
and sixty-six hundredths (5.66) pounds of compressed
natural gas;. The gasoline gallon equivalent applied to
electricity is 33.56 kilowatt hours (kWh);

(xxviii) "Hybrid electric vehicle" means a
vehicle that uses two (2) or more distinct power sources to
move the vehicle and cannot be recharged from any external
source of electricity including a wall socket. "Hybrid
electric vehicle" includes a vehicle which includes an
internal combustion engine and one (1) or more electric
motors but vehicles which use other mechanisms to capture
and use energy may also be included. "Hybrid electric
vehicle" does not include an all-electric vehicle or a
plug-in hybrid electric vehicle;

(xxxviii) "Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle"
means any motor vehicle that uses two (2) or more distinct
power sources to move the vehicle and that can be recharged
from any external source of electricity, including a wall
socket, and the electricity stored in the rechargeable
battery drives or contributes to drive the wheels of the
vehicle. "Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle" does not include
a hybrid electric vehicle, an all-electric vehicle, a
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
motorcycle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(E) or a
multipurpose vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);

(xlviii) "User" means any person who uses
alternative fuel within this state in an internal
combustion engine for the generation of power to propel a
motor vehicle upon a highway;

(l) "All-electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle
that uses electric energy to propel the vehicle, can be
recharged from an external source of electricity and can
use stored electricity to drive or contribute to driving
the wheels of the motor vehicle. "All-electric vehicle"
shall not include a hybrid electric vehicle, a plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle, a motorcycle as defined in W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xv)(E) or a multipurpose vehicle as defined in
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);

(li) "Charge" means to receive and store
electric energy;

(lii) "DC (direct current) fast charging
station" means a device used to charge an all-electric
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
vehicle that meets the definition of "DC Level 1," "DC
Level 2" or "DC Level 3" as defined in Standard J1772 of
the SAE International standards and any future updates to
those standards, or an equivalent power output level.

39-17-303. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(iii) There is levied and shall be collected a
license tax on all electric energy sold or dispensed for
sale or use in this state for charging an all-electric
vehicle at a DC fast charging station.

(c) Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

(ii) Each dealer shall collect the license tax
imposed by this article and is liable for the entire amount
of license taxes imposed. Each DC fast charging station
shall be metered as to the amount of electric energy sold
or dispensed for charging;

HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
(iii) Every person who sells or offers to sell
to the retail trade alternative fuel for use in motor
vehicles shall conspicuously display a sign stating the
price per kilowatt hour including all applicable taxes.

39-17-304. Taxation rate.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section and
W.S. 39-17-305, the total tax on alternative fuel used to
propel a motor vehicle shall be twenty-four cents ($.24)
per gallon. The gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) shall be
used for compressed natural gas, or liquid petroleum gas.
or electricity. The diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) shall be
used for liquefied natural gas or renewable diesel. The
rate shall be imposed as follows:

(iv) Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) through
(iii) of this subsection, there is levied and shall be
collected a license tax of four cents ($.04) per kilowatt
hour on all electricity sold or dispensed for sale or use
in this state to propel a motor vehicle except for
electricity exempted under W.S. 39-17-305.

HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
39-17-307. Compliance; collection procedures.

(a) Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

(i) On or before the last day of each month:

(A) When alternative fuel is purchased to
propel a motor vehicle or distributed in Wyoming from a
Wyoming licensed supplier, the supplier shall report, using
the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all
gallons or kilowatt hours sold in the state during the
preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due for
alternative fuel sold to an end user;

(B) When alternative fuel is purchased out
of Wyoming for use, sale or distribution to propel a motor
vehicle in Wyoming, the Wyoming licensed supplier shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons or kilowatt hours used, sold or
distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit
all taxes due under this article for fuel sold to an end
user;

HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
(C) Each Wyoming licensed supplier with a
Wyoming retail location shall report, using the appropriate
equivalency formula, to the department all gallons or
kilowatt hours of alternative fuel used to propel a motor
vehicle during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes
due under this article for fuel sold to an end user or a
retail location;

(E) Each Wyoming licensed distributor,
importer, exporter with Wyoming retail locations shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons or kilowatt hours of alternative
fuel imported and used to propel a motor vehicle during the
preceding calendar month and remit taxes due under this
article for fuel sold to an end user or a retail location;

(F) Each Wyoming licensed importer shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons or kilowatt hours imported and used
to propel a motor vehicle during the preceding calendar
month and remit taxes due under this article for fuel sold
to an end user unless the tax has been paid to an
out-of-state licensed supplier;
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073

(ii) Each person transporting, conveying or
bringing alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle
into this state for sale, use or distribution in this state
shall furnish the department a verified statement showing
the number of gallons or kilowatt hours, using the
appropriate equivalency formula, of alternative fuel
delivered during the month preceding the report, the name
of the person to whom the delivery was made and the place
of delivery;

(iii) Each person who exports alternative fuel
from this state shall report the number of gallons or
kilowatt hours exported, using the appropriate equivalency
formula, the destination state and the name of the person
to whom exported;

(iv) On or before the last day of each month:

(A) Each dealer, who is not licensed as a
distributor, shall submit a statement to the department in
a format required by the department showing the number of
gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent, kilowatt hours or
HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
diesel gallon equivalent of alternative fuel acquired, the
person who supplied the alternative fuel and the total
gallons, kilowatt hours or gallon equivalents sold during
the preceding calendar month and remit any taxes due if the
point of taxation is at the dispenser;

39-17-308. Enforcement.

(c) Penalties. The following shall apply:

(ix) Any person who does not display the price
per kilowatt hour including all applicable taxes at which
alternative fuel is to be sold as provided by W.S.
39-17-303(c)(iii) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as
provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection.

Section 2. W.S. 39-17-303(a)(ii) is repealed.

Section 3. The department of transportation shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0024

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0073
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0024